California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The proceeds of the sale of any interest in real property which is owned by any association shall be paid into the Fair and Exposition Fund. The amount which is paid into the fund shall be available for expenditure by the association, with the approval of the department and the State Public Works Board, for any of the following purposes:

(a) Permanent improvements for fair purposes on the property of the association.

(b) Purchase of equipment for fair purposes.

(c) Acquisition or purchase of real property, including costs of appraisal or other incidental costs, to be used as sites for the permanent improvements.

The execution of any lease, easement, or agreement for the extraction of any oil or gas from lands owned or controlled by an association is not a sale of an interest in real property within the meaning of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

Any money that is not expended within three years after being paid into the Fair and Exposition Fund pursuant to Section 4002 shall be added to and become a part of the amount available pursuant to Section 3204 for permanent improvements on the property of the state, citrus, county, or district agricultural associations for fair purposes, or the purchase of equipment for fair purposes, or the acquisition or purchase of real property, including costs of appraisal or other incidental costs, to be used as sites for those permanent improvements, in amounts as may be allocated by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 63.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

All revenue which is received by any association pursuant to any lease, easement, or agreement for the extraction of oil or gas from any land that is owned or controlled by it shall be paid into the General Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

The fiscal year for each association is from January 1 to December 31.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers and Duties Generally [4051. - 4061.]

4051.

(a) An association may do any of the following:

(1) Contract, in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The written policies and procedures for contracting that are developed and maintained by the board of directors of the association in accordance with this section.

(B) All applicable state laws governing contracts, except as follows:

(i) A grant or contract entered into by an association for goods is not subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(ii) A grant or contract entered into by an association is not subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(C) If the estimated total cost of any construction project or similar work carried out under this section exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the association shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. The association is subject to all applicable provisions of the Public Contract Code.

(D) An association may elect to become subject to the provisions of the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code) and the Small Business Procurement and Contract Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 14835) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title
 2 of the Government Code), but exempt from the reporting requirements noted in subdivision (f) of Section 14838.1 of the Government Code.

(2) Accept funds or gifts of value from the United States or any person to aid in carrying out the purposes of this part.

(3) Conduct or contract for programs, and contract for the purchase or lease of goods that are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, either independently or in cooperation with any individual, public or private organization, or federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(4) Establish and maintain a bank checking account or other financial institution account, approved by the Director of Finance in accordance with Sections 16506 and 16605 of the Government Code, for depositing funds received by the association. All funds maintained in an
 account authorized by this paragraph shall be used in accordance with Section 4001.

(5) Approve the annual budget of the association and establish a program for paying vendors who contract with the association.

(6) Contract with any county or county fair association for holding a fair jointly with the county or county fair association. The joint fair is a district fair of the association.

(7) Make or adopt all necessary orders, rules, or regulations for governing the activities of the association. Notwithstanding paragraph (14), any orders, rules, or regulations adopted by the board are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For informational purposes only, however, any order, rule, or regulation adopted by the board may be transmitted to the
 Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 11343 of the Government Code.

(8) Operate a payroll system for paying employees, and a system for accounting for vacation and sick leave credits of employees.

(9) Delegate to the officers and employees of the association the exercise of powers vested in the board, as the board may deem desirable, for the orderly management and operation of the association.

(10) With the approval of the Department of General Services, purchase, acquire, hold, sell, or exchange, or convey any interest in real property. Any acquisition of land or other real property is subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(11) With the approval of the Department of General Services, make permanent improvements upon publicly owned real property adjacent to, or near the vicinity of, the real property of the association when the improvements materially benefit the property of the association pursuant to Section 11011 of the Government Code.

(12) With the approval of the Department of General Services, lease for the use of its real property, or any portion of that property, to any person or public body for whatever purpose as may be approved by the board. This purpose may include, but not be limited to, the construction and maintenance of housing affordable to persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined by Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to a lease of not more than 55 years.

(13) Use, manage, or operate any of its property jointly or in connection with
 any lessee or sublessee, for any purpose approved by the board.

(14) With the approval of the Department of General Services, pledge any revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind, pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the board. The revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind pledged by the association or its assignees constitute a lien or security interest that immediately attaches to the property pledged, and is effective, binding, and enforceable against the association, its successors, purchasers of the property pledged, creditors, and all others asserting rights therein, to the extent set forth, and in accordance with, the terms and conditions of the pledge, irrespective of whether those persons have notice of the pledge and without the need for physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further
 action.

(15) With the approval of the secretary, enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) In developing the written policies and procedures for contracting, the board shall incorporate the following to apply to contracts or procurement by the association:

(1) To ensure the fullest competition, the board shall adopt and publish competitive bidding procedures for the award of a procurement or contract involving an expenditure of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The competitive bidding procedures shall include, but not be limited to, requirements for submission of bids and accompanying documentation, guidelines for the use of requests for proposals, invitations to bid,
 or other methods of bidding, and a bid protest procedure. The general manager shall determine whether the goods or services subject to this paragraph are available through existing contracts or price schedules of the Department of General Services. The Legislature finds and declares that fairs are a valuable community resource and recognizes that local businesses and local communities make valuable contributions to fairs that include direct and indirect support of fair programs. The Legislature further finds and declares that local businesses often provide opportunity purchases to local fairs that, for similar things available through the state purchasing program, may be purchased locally at a price equivalent to or less than that available through the state purchasing program. As used in this subdivision, opportunity purchases means purchases made locally, either individually or cooperatively, at a price equal to or less than the price available through the state purchasing program on or off state
 contract.

(2) The contracting standards, procedures, and rules contained in this subdivision shall also apply with respect to any subcontract involving an expenditure of more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The board shall establish, as part of the bidding procedures for general contracts, subcontracting guidelines that implement this requirement.

(3) With the approval of the Department of General Services, pledge any and all revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, and other rights to payment of whatever kind, pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the board. Any issuance of bonds, contracts entered into, debts incurred, settlements, judgments, or liens under this section or pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the
 state or any political subdivision of the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. The bond shall contain on its face a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.”

(4) This section does not apply to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4101) of Chapter 6 of Part 3.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an association shall adopt a fiscal review policy as follows:

(1) An association with an annual budget exceeding five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall conduct an annual audit by an independent certified public accountant or certified public accountancy firm selected by the board.

(2) (A) An association with an annual budget of less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall have its books and accounts examined and reviewed annually and audited once every three years by an independent certified public accountant or certified public accountancy firm selected by the board.

(B) Solely for the 50th District Agricultural Association, which has entered into a joint powers agreement pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code) to manage the responsibilities of the association, the joint powers agency shall be the entity responsible for ensuring that the annual examinations and reviews and the audits required by this paragraph are conducted. If the joint powers agency performs separate audits of the association and the joint powers agency, the joint
 powers agency shall submit both audits to the department in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the department may require an audit to be conducted before the times specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) if the department or the state deems the audit is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 73.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in accordance with procedures established by the board, the board may enter into agreements to secure donations, memberships, and corporate and individual sponsorships, and may enter into marketing and licensing agreements for the receipt of money, or services or products in lieu of money, and may employ, or create and participate in an entity, or enter into an agreement with an entity or person to develop, solicit, sell, and service these agreements. The compensation for the entity or person shall be established by the board.

(b) Written notification to the department shall be required prior to creating an entity for the activities described in this section and prior to entering into any agreement for activities described in this section if the agreement exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in value, exists for a period of greater than two years, or contemplates the building of a permanent structure on fair property. The department may, upon reasonable notice, examine the books and records of any entity created pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 423, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.2.

An association shall not enter into a settlement agreement for an amount greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) without the prior approval of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 7.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

An association shall not lease its racetrack for running races of horses to any private person, firm, or corporation, except to a national or international exposition or its affiliated corporations or associations for the period of time which is now permitted by law for fairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

4054.

(a) If the board of an association, by resolution adopted by vote of two-thirds of all its members, finds and determines that the public interest and necessity require the acquisition of any building or improvement that is situated on property that is owned by the association, in trust or otherwise, or of any outstanding rights to that property, with the approval of the department and the association, the building, improvement, or outstanding rights may be acquired by eminent domain pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) The use by the association of its property shall be considered a more necessary public use than the use of the property by any grantee, lessee, or licensee for the purposes that are specified in Section 4051.

(c) Notwithstanding Article 5 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code, or Sections 10108 and 10308 of the Public Contract Code, the board of an association or governing board of a county fair, by resolution adopted by vote of two-thirds of all its members, may purchase materials and lease equipment for not in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) when the purchase or lease is made in conjunction with donated labor construction improvements on the grounds of the association or the county fairgrounds, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 197.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4055.

Associations, by majority vote of their respective boards, may cooperate in the holding of a fair in any of the districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4056.

An association may pay membership fees, and join and participate in the affairs of any organization which has the following purposes:

(a) Interchange of information that relates to livestock, poultry, and other agricultural animals and products.

(b) Conduct and management of fairs.

(c) Conducting of horseracing meetings.

An association may also pay membership fees, join and participate in affairs of any similar organization that deals with subjects that are related to powers and duties of the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

4057.

The state is not liable for any action, obligation, commitment, contract, or premium that is offered, or award that is made, by any association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 342, Sec. 9.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4058.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4052, the California Exposition and State Fair, a district agricultural association fair, or county fair in the northern zone, with the approval of the Department of Food and Agriculture, may form an entity for conducting combined fair horseracing meetings and utilize their racing facilities for conducting horseracing meetings, with parimutuel wagering, on days other than the days on which general fair activities are conducted. A combined fair horseracing meeting pursuant to this section shall be a general fair activity for the purpose of Section 19549 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The association shall designate certain days of a mixed breed meeting held pursuant to this section as charity days with the proceeds therefrom to be distributed in accordance with Sections 19550 and 19556 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The association shall encourage the racing of emerging breeds of horses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 741, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4059.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Food and Agriculture shall develop criteria to be used, subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, for the disposal of property by a district agricultural association and the California Exposition and State Fair.

(2) As used in this section, “disposal of property” means the sale of equipment, materials or other forms of personal property no longer necessary to effectuate the purposes of the fair and that do not exceed an estimated fair market value of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(b) The board of the district agricultural association or California Exposition and State Fair shall, prior to the disposal of property, as defined in this section, first be required to determine, through the Department of Food and Agriculture, if the property can be used by another fair in the California Fair Network or other state agency or department. If determined that such use is not possible, the board of the district agricultural association or California Exposition and State Fair shall sell the property to the buyer that submits the highest bid.

(c) The regular department audit of district agricultural associations shall confirm the source of funds of any disposed property and compliance with the criteria developed under this section for the disposal of property.

(d) The adoption of the criteria developed pursuant to this section shall relieve a district agricultural association and the California Exposition and State Fair of any requirements to abide by the provisions of the State Administrative Manual which may apply to disposal of property developed by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4060.

(a) Any compensation to any officer or employee of the state by any nonprofit corporation formed exclusively to aid and assist an association, as provided for in Section 18000.5 of the Government Code, shall be approved by the department before payment. The nonprofit corporation shall notify the department of the compensation.

(b) The department shall, during regular audits, review the payments from the nonprofit corporation to any state employees and those state employees’ responsibilities to the nonprofit corporation. The financial information from the nonprofit corporation shall be made available to the department for the audit. Any compensation shall be justified by related work that is not the normal responsibility of the
 state officer or employee through employment by an association, including normal duties and working hours. The audit shall also determine if any board member serving on an association is also serving on the board of directors of the related nonprofit corporation and determine if there are any conflicts of interest regarding the payment to the association employees. The audit shall also determine if any officer or employee is receiving compensation from the nonprofit corporation in violation of subdivision (c).

(c) Pursuant to Section 1090 of the Government Code, a state officer or employee of an association shall not be compensated by the nonprofit corporation when that state officer or employee acts in an official capacity regarding any contract made with the nonprofit corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 64.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4061.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a district agricultural association shall not be required to prepare or submit any written report to the Governor, the Legislature, or a state agency except as follows:

(1) The report is required by a court or under federal law.

(2) The report is required in the Budget Act.

(3) The report is required by the secretary.

(4) The Legislature expressly requires a district agricultural association to prepare and submit a report.

(5) The annual reporting of real property information required pursuant to Section 11011.15 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall not be construed and is not intended to extend or limit the provisions of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 119.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Provisions Regarding Particular Associations [4101. - 4202.]



  ARTICLE 1. California Science Center [4101. - 4109.]

4101.

(a) The Sixth District Agricultural Association shall also be known as Exposition Park. It is in the Natural Resources Agency and is deemed to be a tax-exempt organization as an instrumentality of this state in accordance with Section 23706 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) All of the following shall apply to Exposition Park:

(1) The Board of Directors of the Sixth District Agricultural Association shall be the Board of Directors for Exposition Park and for the California Science Center, except with respect to those matters delegated to the Exposition Park Manager pursuant to Section 4108 or the Board of Directors of the California African American Museum pursuant to Section 4104.

(2) Property or other interests presently held in title by the Sixth District Agricultural Association, also known as the California Science Center, except as detailed in paragraph (3), shall vest in Exposition Park on behalf of the State of California.

(3) Upon the effective date of the change in name referred to in subdivision (a), there shall be deemed located within Exposition Park an entity referred to as the California Science Center, which shall include the Samuel Oschin Space Shuttle Endeavour Display Pavilion; the 3D IMAX Theater; the Dr. Theodore T. Alexander, Jr. Science Center School; the Wallis Annenberg Building; Phase I and Phase II of the California Science Center; and any additional construction developed pursuant to Phase III of the Master Plan developed and approved for Exposition Park, including any development authorized pursuant to Sections 4103 and 4103.5. The
 California Science Center shall manage, lease, and dispose of the property identified in this paragraph consistent with existing state law, in coordination with the Exposition Park Manager, and with approval of the Exposition Park Board, and all contracts or other agreements for this property that identify the California Science Center as the contracting party.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 3964, the Exposition Park Manager appointed pursuant to Section 4108 shall be considered the executive director and manager of the board of directors of Exposition Park, except that the executive director of the California Science Center shall be considered the executive director and manager of the board of directors for matters within the sole jurisdiction of the California Science Center.

(5) Consistent with Section 4060, and all other applicable state law, a state officer or employee of the
 Sixth District Agricultural Association, including any officer or employee of any state entity located in Exposition Park, shall not accept any compensation from any nonprofit organization for work performed in part or in full without prior written approval from the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 4.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Science Center, with the approval of the Director of General Services and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, may enter into a long-term lease agreement, not to exceed 40 years, with terms and conditions determined by the Director of General Services to be in the best interest of the state, with the Los Angeles Unified School District to convert the Armory, also known as the Wallis Annenberg Building, and surrounding land in or near Exposition Park to a demonstration mathematics and science-based school.

(b) For the purposes of carrying out subdivision (a), all of the following requirements apply:

(1) Plans shall be developed by the Los Angeles Unified School District for the conversion described in subdivision (a).

(2) The Los Angeles Unified School District shall demonstrate to the Director of General Services that it has sufficient funds, from sources other than the California Science Center, to complete the conversion.

(3) The Los Angeles Unified School District shall give attention to the historical preservation of the Armory, also known as the Wallis Annenberg Building, in developing plans and completing the conversion.

(4) All lease documents necessary to complete the conversion shall be approved by the Director of General Services before their execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 5.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Science Center is hereby authorized to enter into a site lease with the California Science Center Foundation, a California Nonprofit Corporation, with the approval of the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Finance, and the Department of General Services, for the purpose of the foundation developing, constructing, equipping, furnishing, and funding the project known as Phase II of the California Science Center. The overall construction cost and scope shall be consistent with the amount authorized in the Budget Act of 2002, provided that this section shall not prevent the foundation from expending additional nonstate funds to complete Phase II provided that the additional expenditures do not result in additional state operation and maintenance costs. Any additional
 expenditure of nonstate funds by the foundation shall not increase the state’s contribution.

(b) For the purpose of carrying out subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) In connection with the development described in subdivision (a), above, the foundation may, in its determination, select the most qualified construction manager/general contractor to oversee and manage the work and prepare the competitive bid packages for all major subcontractors to be engaged in the construction of the Phase II Project. Any construction manager/general contractor selected shall be required to have a California general contractor’s license.

(2) Before commencement of construction of the Phase II Project, the California Science Center shall enter into a lease-purchase agreement upon approval by the Department of Finance with
 the foundation on terms that are compatible with the Phase I Project financing. The term of the lease-purchase agreement shall be a term not to exceed 25 years. Lease payments on behalf of the state shall be commensurate with the twenty-two million nine hundred forty-five thousand two hundred sixty-three dollars ($22,945,263), (nineteen million one hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($19,137,000) plus 19.9 percent augmentation authority) construction cost allocation of the state. Lease payments may also include any cost of financing that the foundation may incur related to tax-exempt financing. The California Science Center shall be authorized to direct the Controller to send the rental payments under the lease-purchase agreement directly to the foundation’s bond trustee.

(3) The foundation shall ensure that the Phase II Project is inspected during construction by the state in the manner consistent with state infrastructure projects. The
 foundation shall also indemnify and defend and save harmless the Department of General Services for any and all claims and losses accruing and resulting from or arising out of the foundation’s use of the state’s plans and specifications. The foundation and the California Science Center, upon consultation with the Director of General Services and the Department of Finance, shall agree on a reasonable level of state oversight throughout the construction of the Phase II Project in order to assist the foundation in the completion of the project within the intended scope and cost.

(4) At the end of the term of the site lease and the lease-purchase agreement unencumbered title to the land and improvements shall return to the state with jurisdiction held by Exposition Park and the facilities managed by the California Science Center on behalf of Exposition Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 119.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the operation of the California Science Center may require individual skills not generally available in state civil service to support specialized functions, such as exhibit maintenance, and educational and guest services programs, including animal care and horticulture.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Science Center may enter into a personal services contract or contracts with the California Science Center Foundation without a competitive bidding process. These contracts shall be subject to approval by the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of General Services and be subject to all state audit requirements.

(c) Notwithstanding any
 other law, for any fiscal year, the Director of Finance may allocate moneys to the California Science Center to mitigate the impact of future state minimum wage increases on contracts authorized pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Allocations made pursuant to subdivision (c) shall occur no sooner than 30 days, or no sooner than a lesser time as determined by the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or their designee, after notification is provided in writing to all of the following:

(A) The chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations.

(B) The chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the state budget.

(C) The Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget
 Committee.

(2) The notification shall include the amount of the proposed allocation and an explanation of the rationale for the proposed amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

Exposition Park, with the approval of the Natural Resources Agency, may build, construct, and maintain and operate a stadium or any arena, pavilion, or other building that is to be used for the holding of sports events, athletic contests, contests of skill, exhibitions, spectacles, and other public meetings. It may lease, let, or grant licenses for the use of that stadium, arena, pavilion, or other building, with the approval of the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 7.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

The California Science Center, in consultation with the Exposition Park Manager, may establish an air and space center in its building at Exposition Park in the City of Los Angeles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 8.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.5.

(a) (1) The California Science Center may enter into one or more agreements or leases with the California Science Center Foundation, a California nonprofit public benefit corporation, with the approval of the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Finance, and the Department of General Services, for the purpose of developing, designing, constructing, equipping, furnishing, operating, and funding the project known as the Phase III Project of the California Science Center, which is located adjacent to or contiguous with the existing Phase I Project and Phase II Project of the California Science Center in Exposition Park. Those agreements and leases shall include a site lease of the land on which the Phase III Facilities are to be constructed with the California Science Center Foundation for a nominal
 payment, and a lease-purchase agreement pursuant to which the California Science Center shall lease and acquire the Phase III Facilities from the California Science Center Foundation. The site lease and the lease-purchase agreement shall be for a term ending 30 years after the later of October 1, 2022, or the date on which the Phase III Facilities are certified available for use and occupancy. The lease payments on behalf of the state shall be two million four hundred thirty thousand dollars ($2,430,000) per year for the term of the lease-purchase agreement, commencing on the later of October 1, 2022, or the date on which Phase III Facilities are certified available for use and occupancy.

(2) Before entering into any agreement or lease with the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project, the California Science Center shall have approval for the Phase III Project from the Natural Resources Agency and the Department of
 Finance.

(3) All agreements or leases entered into between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall be on terms compatible with the financing arrangements that exist on the Phase I Project and Phase II Project. The entire design and construction cost of the Phase III Project shall be the sole responsibility of the California Science Center Foundation. Except for the lease payments contemplated in paragraph (1), any agreement or lease entered into between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall not contain terms, either directly or indirectly, that obligate the California Science Center, Exposition Park, or the state to pay or repay any debt issuance or other financing that may be associated with the Phase III Project.

(4) Except for
 the site lease and the lease-purchase agreement described in paragraph (1), the agreements or leases entered into between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project may have a term of up to 50 years. The California Science Center Foundation shall agree not to enter into any third-party donation, grant, or funding arrangement that limits or restricts the use or purpose of the Phase III Project beyond the agreement or lease duration as authorized in this section.

(5) All agreements or leases entered into between the California Science Center and the California Science Center Foundation relating to the Phase III Project shall contain a provision that the California Science Center Foundation agrees to indemnify, defend, and save harmless the state from any and all claims and losses arising out of the design and construction of the Phase III Project to the same extent the state is
 customarily indemnified by its architects, engineers, and contractors in connection with state infrastructure projects of similar type and scope.

(6) The scope of the Phase III Project shall be consistent with the Exposition Park Master Plan and may include the demolition of existing administration buildings and other ancillary state facilities. The Phase III Project shall be developed in a manner that is consistent with the state’s climate change goals and the Green Building Action Plan, and complies with the requirements of Executive Order No. B-18-12, including, but not limited to, meeting the LEED Silver and other requirements for new or major renovated state buildings. The scope of the Phase III Project shall be consistent with the plans and specifications as approved by the Office of the State Fire Marshal and the Division of the State Architect in November 2016.

(b) For the
 purpose of carrying out subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply:

(1) All contracts in connection with the design, construction, and installation of the Phase III Project shall be contracts entered into by the California Science Center Foundation, and notwithstanding any other law, shall not be subject to state procurement law or law pertaining to state contracts.

(2) The California Science Center Foundation shall, and shall cause its contractors to, coordinate construction activity associated with the Phase III Facilities with the Exposition Park Manager and shall ensure the construction activity is carried out in a manner that complies with all existing leases and other commitments of the state with respect to Exposition Park and limits the impact on the tenants in and visitors to Exposition Park. Significant aspects of construction activity such as staging, parking,